Nebraska, session 109, LB874.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
-1-

LB874 LB874
2026 2026
Section 1. Section 28-306, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-306 (1) A person who causes the death of another unintentionally
while engaged in the operation of a motor vehicle in violation of the law
of the State of Nebraska or in violation of any city or village ordinance
commits motor vehicle homicide.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, motor
vehicle homicide is a Class I misdemeanor.
(3)(a) If the proximate cause of the death of another is the
operation of a motor vehicle in violation of section 60-6,179.01,
60-6,179.02, 60-6,213, or 60-6,214, motor vehicle homicide is a Class
IIIA felony.
(b) If the proximate cause of the death of another is the operation
of a motor vehicle in violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197.06, motor
vehicle homicide is a Class IIA felony.
(c) If the proximate cause of the death of another is the operation
of a motor vehicle in violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197.06, motor
vehicle homicide is a Class II felony if the defendant has a prior
conviction for a violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197.06, under a
city or village ordinance enacted in conformance with section 60-6,196,
or under a law of another state if, at the time of the conviction under
the law of such other state, the offense for which the defendant was
convicted would have been a violation of section 60-6,196.
(4)(a) For a conviction under subsection (2) or subdivision (3)(a)
of this section, the court may, as part of the judgment of conviction,
order the person not to drive any motor vehicle for any purpose for a
period of up to two years and order that the operator's license of such
person be suspended for the same period.
(b) For a conviction under subdivision (3)(b) or (c) of this
section, the court shall, as part of the judgment of conviction, order
the person not to drive any motor vehicle for any purpose for a period of
-2-

LB874 LB874
2026 2026
fifteen years and shall order that the operator's license of such person
be revoked for the same period.
(5) An order of the court described in this section shall be
administered upon sentencing, upon final judgment of any appeal or
review, or upon the date that any probation is revoked.
(6) The crime punishable under this section shall be treated as a
separate and distinct offense from any other offense arising out of acts
alleged to have been committed while the person was in violation of this
section.
Sec. 2. Section 28-394, Revised Statutes Supplement, 2025, is
amended to read:
28-394 (1) A person who causes the death of an unborn child
unintentionally while engaged in the operation of a motor vehicle in
violation of the law of the State of Nebraska or in violation of any city
or village ordinance commits motor vehicle homicide of an unborn child.
(2) Except as provided in subsection (3) of this section, motor
vehicle homicide of an unborn child is a Class I misdemeanor.
(3)(a) If the proximate cause of the death of an unborn child is the
operation of a motor vehicle in violation of section 60-6,179.01,
60-6,179.02, 60-6,213, or 60-6,214, motor vehicle homicide of an unborn
child is a Class IIIA felony.
(b) Except as provided in subdivision (3)(c) of this section, if the
proximate cause of the death of an unborn child is the operation of a
motor vehicle in violation of section 60-6,196 or 60-6,197.06, motor
vehicle homicide of an unborn child is a Class IIA felony.
(c) If the proximate cause of the death of an unborn child is the
operation of a motor vehicle in violation of section 60-6,196 or
60-6,197.06 and the defendant has a prior conviction for a violation of
section 60-6,196 or a city or village ordinance enacted in conformance
with section 60-6,196, motor vehicle homicide of an unborn child is a
Class II felony.
-3-

LB874 LB874
2026 2026
(4)(a) For a conviction under subsection (2) or subdivision (3)(a)
of this section, the court may, as part of the judgment of conviction,
order the person not to drive any motor vehicle for any purpose for a
period of up to two years and order that the operator's license of such
person be suspended for the same period.
(b) For a conviction under subdivision (3)(b) or (c) of this
section, the court shall, as part of the judgment of conviction, order
the person not to drive any motor vehicle for any purpose for a period of
at least sixty days and not more than fifteen years after the date
ordered by the court and shall order that the operator's license of such
person be revoked for the same period. The revocation shall not run
concurrently with any jail term imposed.
(5) An order of the court described in this section shall be
administered upon sentencing, upon final judgment of any appeal or
review, or upon the date that any probation is revoked.
(6) The crime punishable under this section shall be treated as a
separate and distinct offense from any other offense arising out of acts
alleged to have been committed while the person was in violation of this
section.
Sec. 3. Original sections 28-306 and 28-394, Revised Statutes
Supplement, 2025, are repealed.
-4-